California statutes. Public Resources Code
 Capital Programs and Climate Financing Authority and the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank, may provide information to the owners and operators of those facilities about financing that may be available to fund facility improvements to increase the capture, or reduce the escape, of methane emissions.

(r) Consistent with the decisions in Scott v. Bd. of Equalization (1996) 50 Cal.App.4th 1597 and Schettler v. County of Santa Clara (1977) 74 Cal.App.3d 990, the free provision, or granting of incentive payments for use, of compost or mulch by a jurisdiction constitutes a public purpose resulting in the public benefits of reducing greenhouse gas emissions, increasing soil productivity and water retention, and facilitating diversion of organic waste and so shall not be construed to be gifts of public funds in violation of Section 6 of Article XVI of the California Constitution. This
 subdivision does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 710, Sec. 17.5.   (AB 786)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

42652.6.

Paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 18993.1 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, as that section read on January 1, 2022, does not apply until January 1, 2025, as long as the conditions in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (h) of Section 18993.1 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations are fully met and no more than 50 percent as an annual average of the biosolids produced during the prior calendar year are transported to activities constituting landfill disposal before January 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 344, Sec. 2.   (AB 1985)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42652.7.

Article 10 (commencing with Section 18991.1) of Chapter 12 of Division 7 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations does not apply to an agricultural crop preparation service, as defined in Section 3001 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations, that demonstrates to the department, in a form and manner developed by the department, that it has not disposed of organic waste, including, but not limited to, culls, fruit skins, hulls, leaves, seed pits, shells, and
 sticks, in a landfill on or after January 1, 2016.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 719, Sec. 1.   (AB 1046)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

42652.8.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, a local jurisdiction that does not qualify for a waiver pursuant to subdivision (a), (c), or (d) of Section 18984.12 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, as that section read on January 1, 2023,
 that disposed of fewer than 5,000 tons of solid waste in 2014, and that has fewer than 7,500 people, qualifies for a waiver until December 1, 2028.

(b) A local jurisdiction seeking a low population waiver pursuant to
 subdivision (a) shall apply to the department. The application shall include both of the following:

(1) Information that establishes that the local jurisdiction meets the criteria in subdivision (a).

(2) The number of tons of solid waste that the local jurisdiction disposed of in 2014 if the local jurisdiction has not submitted the 2014 data directly to the department’s disposal reporting system in 2014.

(c) Beginning January 1, 2027, the department may, in its discretion, renew a waiver issued pursuant to subdivision (a) in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 18984.12 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “local jurisdiction” includes a city, a county, a city and county, or a special district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   (SB 613)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

42653.

(a) No later than July 1, 2020, the department, in consultation with the State Air Resources Board, shall analyze the progress that the waste sector, state government, and local governments have made in achieving the organic waste reduction goals for 2020 and 2025 established in Section 39730.6 of the Health and Safety Code. The analysis shall include all of the following:

(1) The status of new organics recycling infrastructure development, including the commitment of state funding and appropriate rate increases for solid waste and recycling services to support infrastructure expansion.

(2) The progress in reducing
 regulatory barriers to the siting of organics recycling facilities and the timing and effectiveness of policies that will facilitate the permitting of organics recycling infrastructure.

(3) The status of markets for the products generated by organics recycling facilities, including cost-effective electrical interconnection and common carrier pipeline injection of digester biomethane and the status of markets for compost, biomethane, and other products from the recycling of organic waste.

(b) If the department determines that significant progress has not been made on the items analyzed pursuant to subdivision (a), the department may include incentives or additional requirements in the regulations described in Section 42652.5 to facilitate progress towards achieving the organic
 waste reduction goals for 2020 and 2025 established in Section 39730.6 of the Health and Safety Code. The department may, upon consultation with stakeholders, recommend to the Legislature revisions to those organic waste reduction goals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 142.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42654.

This chapter shall not limit the authority of a local jurisdiction to adopt, implement, or enforce requirements in addition to those set forth in the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 395, Sec. 6.   (SB 1383)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

42655.

(a) The department, in consultation with the State Air Resources Board, shall
 assist local jurisdictions in complying with the requirements of
 this chapter, including any regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 42652.5.

(b) This section does not limit a local government’s obligation to comply with the requirements of this chapter, including any regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 42652.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 445, Sec. 1.   (SB 45)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

42656.

(a) By January 1, 2027, the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery shall develop and certify a program environmental impact report pursuant to Section 15168 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations to streamline the permitting process for small and medium compostable material handling facilities or operations in the state that accept agricultural, food, and green materials. The program environmental impact report shall streamline the process with which jurisdictions can develop and site those facilities or operations to ensure organic material in the state is processed to its highest and best use.

(b) For the purposes of this section, all of the following definitions apply:

(1) “Agricultural material” has the same meaning as defined in Section 17852 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) “Compostable material handling facility or operation” has the same meaning as defined in Section 17852 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) “Food material” has the same meaning as defined in Section 17852 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(4) “Green material” has the same meaning as defined in Section 17852 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(5) “Medium compostable material handling facility or operation” means a facility or operation that handles more than 5,000 and not more than 12,500 cubic yards of material, including feedstock, compost material, additives,
 amendments, and finished compost at any one time.

(6) “Small compostable material handling facility or operation” means a facility or operation that handles not more than 5,000 cubic yards of material, including feedstock, compost material, additives, amendments, and finished compost at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 452, Sec. 1.   (SB 1046)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Paving Materials [42700. - 42705.]



  ARTICLE 1. Recycled Materials [42700. - 42704.6.]

42700.

The Director of Transportation, upon consultation with the board, shall review and modify all bid specifications relating to the purchase of paving materials, and base, subbase, and pervious backfill materials, using recycled materials. The recycled materials shall include, but are not limited to, recycled asphalt pavement, crushed concrete subbase, foundry slag, asphalt flux produced from the reprocessing or re-refining of used oil, and paving materials utilizing recycled materials, including, but not limited to, crumb rubber from automobile tires, ash, and glass and glassy aggregates. The specifications shall be based on standards developed by the Department of Transportation for recycled paving materials and for recycled base, subbase, and pervious backfill materials. The standards and specifications shall provide for the use of recycled materials and shall not reduce the quality standards for highway and road construction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 901, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

42701.

(a) In purchasing any materials to be used in paving or paving subbase for use by the Department of Transportation and any other state agencies that provide construction and repair services, the State Procurement Officer shall contract for those items that utilize recycled materials in paving materials and base, subbase, and pervious backfill materials, unless the Director of Transportation determines that the use of the materials is not cost effective. In determining the cost-effectiveness of the materials subject to this section, the factors that the director shall consider include both of the following:

(1) The lifespan and durability of the pavement containing the materials.

(2) The maintenance cost of the pavement containing the materials.

(b) This section also applies to any person who contracts with the Department of General Services or with any other state agency to provide these construction and repair services.

(c) The recycled materials shall include, but are not limited to, recycled asphalt, crushed concrete subbase, foundry slag, and paving materials utilizing crumb rubber from automobile tires, ash, and glass and glassy aggregates. The specifications shall be based on the standards of the Department of Transportation for recycled paving materials and for recycled base, subbase, and pervious backfill materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 392, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

42703.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), the Department of Transportation shall require the use of crumb rubber in lieu of other materials at the following levels for state highway construction or repair projects that use asphalt as a construction material:

(1) On and after January 1, 2007, the Department of Transportation shall use, on an annual average, not less than 6.62 pounds of CRM per metric ton of the total amount of asphalt paving materials used.

(2) On and after January 1, 2010, the Department of Transportation shall use, on an annual average, not less than 8.27 pounds of CRM per metric ton of the total amount of asphalt paving materials used.

(3) On and after January 1, 2013, the Department of Transportation shall use, on an annual average, not less than 11.58 pounds of CRM per metric ton of the total amount of asphalt paving materials used.

(b) (1) The annual average use of crumb rubber required in subdivision (a) shall be achieved on a statewide basis and shall not require the use of asphalt containing crumb rubber in each individual project or in a place where it is not feasible to use that material.

(2) On and after January 1, 2007, and before January 1, 2015, not less than 50 percent of the asphalt pavement used to comply with the requirements of subdivision (a) shall be rubberized asphalt concrete.

(3) On and after January 1, 2015, the Department of Transportation may use any material
 meeting the definition of asphalt containing crumb rubber, with respect to product type or specification, to comply with the requirements of subdivision (a).

(c) (1) The Secretary
 of the Transportation Agency shall, on or before January 1 of each year, prepare an analysis comparing the cost differential between asphalt containing crumb rubber and conventional asphalt. The analysis shall include the cost of the quantity of asphalt product needed per lane mile paved and, at a minimum, shall include all of the following:

(A) The lifespan and duration of the asphalt materials.

(B) The maintenance cost of the asphalt materials and other potential cost savings to the department, including, but not limited to, reduced soundwall construction costs resulting from noise reduction qualities of rubberized asphalt concrete.

(C) The difference between each
 type or specification of asphalt containing crumb rubber, considering the cost-effectiveness of each type or specification separately in comparison to the cost-effectiveness of conventional asphalt paving materials.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if, after completing the analysis required by paragraph (1), the secretary determines that the cost of asphalt containing crumb rubber exceeds the cost of conventional asphalt, the Department of Transportation shall continue to meet the requirement specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), and shall not implement the requirement specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). If the secretary determines, pursuant to an analysis prepared pursuant to paragraph (1), that the cost of asphalt containing crumb rubber does not exceed the cost of conventional asphalt, the Department of Transportation shall implement paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) within one year of that determination, but not
 before January 1, 2010.

(3) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if the Department of Transportation delays the implementation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the Department of Transportation shall not implement the requirement of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) until three years after the date the department implements paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(d) For the purposes of complying with the requirements of subdivision (a), only crumb rubber manufactured in the United States that is derived from waste tires taken from vehicles owned and operated in the United States may be used.

(e) The Department of Transportation and the board shall develop procedures for using crumb rubber and other derived tire products in other projects.

(f) The Department of
 Transportation shall notify and confer with the East Bay Municipal Utility District before using asphalt containing crumb rubber on a state highway construction or repair project that overlays district infrastructure.

(g) For purposes of this section the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Asphalt containing crumb rubber” means any asphalt pavement construction, rehabilitation, or maintenance material that contains reclaimed tire rubber and that is specified for use by the Department of Transportation.

(2) “Crumb rubber” or “CRM” has the same meaning as defined in Section 42801.7.

(3) “Rubberized asphalt concrete” or “RAC” means a paving material that uses an asphalt rubber binder containing an amount of reclaimed tire rubber that is 15 percent or
 more by weight of the total blend, and that meets other specifications for both the physical properties of asphalt rubber and the application of asphalt rubber, as defined in the American Society for Testing and Materials (ASTM) Standard Specification for Asphalt-Rubber Binder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 198, Sec. 1.   (AB 3246)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

42704.

(a) On or before January 1, 2014, the Department of Transportation may, with input from the Caltrans/Industry Rock Products Committee, establish specifications for the use of reclaimed asphalt pavement (RAP) of up to 40 percent for hot mix asphalt mixes.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not limit the authority of the Department of Transportation to establish specifications for the use of reclaimed asphalt pavement in amounts greater than 40 percent for hot mix asphalt mixes.

(c) (1) On or before March 1, 2016, the Department of Transportation shall submit a report to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the
 Government Code on its progress, since the year 2011, toward the development and implementation of the specifications for reclaimed asphalt pavement, as specified in subdivision (a). 

(2) This subdivision shall become inoperative on March 1, 2020, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 230, Sec. 1.   (AB 812)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

42704.5.

By January 1, 2017, a local agency that has jurisdiction over a street or highway shall do either of the following:

(a) Adopt the standards developed by the Department of Transportation pursuant to Section 42700 for recycled paving materials and for recycled base, subbase,
 and pervious backfill materials.

(b) Discuss at a
 regularly scheduled public hearing of the local agency’s legislative or other governing body why the standards are not being adopted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 609, Sec. 1.   (AB 2355)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

42704.6.

(a) A local agency that has jurisdiction over a street or highway shall, to the extent feasible and cost effective, apply standard specifications that allow for the use of recycled materials in streets and highways.

(b) The standard specifications described in subdivision (a) shall allow recycled materials at a level no less than the level allowed in the department’s standard specifications, as those standard specifications may be amended or updated from time to time, for all of the following:

(1) Recycled base and subbase materials as set forth in Sections 25-1.02 and 26-1.02 of the department’s standard specifications.

(2) Reclaimed
 asphalt pavement and other materials in asphalt as set forth in Section 39-2.02B of the department’s standard specifications.

(3) Reclaimed aggregate, fly ash, returned plastic concrete, and other materials in concrete as set forth in Sections 90-1.02, 90-2.02, and 90-9 of the department’s standard specifications.

(c) If a local agency’s standard specifications do not allow for the use of recycled materials at a level that is equal to or greater than the level allowed in the department’s standard specifications, as described in subdivision (b), on the basis that the use of those recycled materials at those levels is not feasible, a person bidding on a contract advertised by the local agency to supply materials subject to those specifications may request the local agency to provide the reason for that determination. The local agency shall provide the reason for that determination
 via email correspondence to the person’s official point of contact specified in the request.

(d) This section does not prohibit a local agency that has jurisdiction over a street or highway from exceeding the maximum level allowed in the department’s standard specifications for the use of materials described in subdivision (b).

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Department” means the Department of Transportation.

(2) “Local agency that has jurisdiction over a street or highway” does not include any special district, any city whose population, according to the most recent census, is equal to or less than 25,000 people, or any county whose population, according to the most recent census, is equal to or less than
 100,000 people.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 443, Sec. 1.   (AB 978)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Tire-Fired Kilns [42705. - 42705.]

42705.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares as follows:

(a) California currently faces a serious problem with respect to the collection, disposal, and recycling of used tires that are no longer consumer usable.

(b) It is estimated that California has an existing tire inventory of at least 100 million tires, an amount which grows by over 20 million tires per year.

(c) California has pursued several methods of tire disposal including, but not limited to, shredding and as an additive to asphalt for paving material.

(d) The cement industry in California has implemented a process that utilizes used tires as fuel for the kilns essential to the manufacture of cement.

(e) Used tires utilized as fuel for those kilns are completely consumed, including the rubber, fiber, and steel ingredients of the tire.

(f) The use of used tires in that process benefits California by reducing reliance on fossil fuel imported from outside the state.

(g)The consumption of used tires rather than fossil fuel for the kilns may reduce air pollution and may contribute to the improvement of air quality.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 605, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. Newsprint [42750. - 42791.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [42750. - 42756.]

42750.

“Consumer of newsprint” means a person who uses newsprint in a commercial printing operation or in a commercial publishing operation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 23.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

42752.

“Deink” or “deinking old newspapers” means a process in which old newspaper is mixed with water, the paper fibers are separated to form a paper pulp, and the pulp is cleaned to remove contaminants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 23.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

42753.

“Newsprint” means uncoated paper, whether supercalendered or machine finished, of the type generally used for, but is not limited to, the publication of newspapers, commercial advertising inserts, directories, or commercial advertising mailers, which is made primarily from mechanical woodpulps combined with some chemical woodpulp. “Newsprint” includes paper made from old newspapers which have been deinked, using the recycled pulp in lieu of virgin pulp. “Newsprint” includes all grades of paper sold as newsprint, supercalendered (SC) uncoated groundwood, or machine finished (MF) uncoated groundwood.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 23.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

42754.

“Old newspaper” or “recovered newspaper” means any newsprint which is separated from other types of solid waste or collected separately from other types of solid waste and made available for reuse in making new newsprint, and which meets quality standards for use as a raw material in the manufacture of a new paper product.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 23.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

42755.

“Post consumer waste paper” means a finished material which would normally be disposed of as a solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item, including, but not limited to, printing plant waste paper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 23.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

42756.

“Recycled-content newsprint” means newsprint in which not less than 40 percent of its fiber consists of post consumer waste paper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 23.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Recycled-Content Newsprint Program [42760. - 42762.]

42760.

On and after January 1, 1991, every consumer of newsprint in California shall ensure that at least 25 percent of all newsprint used by that consumer of newsprint is made from recycled-content newsprint, if recycled-content newsprint is available at a price comparable to that of newsprint made from virgin material, if the recycled-content newsprint meets the quality standards established by the board pursuant to Section 42775, and if the recycled-content newsprint is available within a reasonable period of time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 23.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

42761.

The percentage of newsprint used which is made from recycled-content newsprint shall be calculated in tons used on an annual basis and shall increase to:

(a) Thirty percent on and after January 1, 1994.

(b) Thirty-five percent on and after January 1, 1996.

(c) Forty percent on and after January 1, 1998.

(d) Fifty percent on and after January 1, 2000.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 23.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

42762.

This division does not apply to any newsprint purchased prior to January 1, 1990.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 23.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Certification of Use [42770. - 42775.]

42770.

Each consumer of newsprint within the State of California shall, on or before March 1 of each year, certify to the board the number of tons of newsprint used during the preceding calendar year and the number of tons of recycled-content newsprint used during the preceding calendar year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 23.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

42771.

Every consumer of newsprint who submits recycled-content newsprint usage certification pursuant to Section 42770 may be subject to an audit to ensure that the recycled-content newsprint was used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 23.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

42772.

Each person who supplies a consumer of newsprint with newsprint shall certify the amounts of recycled-content newsprint contained in each shipment to each consumer of newsprint. If a shipment contains no recycled-content newsprint, the supplier shall so certify.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 23.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

42773.

If a consumer of newsprint is unable to obtain sufficient amounts of recycled-content newsprint within any reporting period because recycled-content newsprint was not available at a comparable price to that for virgin material, failed to meet the quality standards established pursuant to Section 42775, or was not available within a reasonable period of time, the consumer of newsprint shall so certify to the board and shall provide the board with the specific reason for failing to use recycled-content newsprint. In order to make that certification in good faith, the newsprint consumer shall have contacted, for the purpose of obtaining recycled-content newsprint, every producer of recycled-content newsprint that offered to sell recycled-content newsprint to the consumer of newsprint within the last 12 months. The name of each person contacted, the corporate name, if any, and address and telephone number shall accompany each filing with the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 23.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

42774.

For the purposes of implementing and enforcing this chapter, the board shall develop and maintain a list which identifies every consumer of newsprint, as defined in Section 42750, and every person who supplies a consumer of newsprint with newsprint, in the state. The board may use information from local business permits, trade publications, or any other relevant information to develop the list.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 134.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

42775.

(a) For the purposes of implementing and enforcing this chapter, the board shall set newsprint comparable quality standards for each of the grades of newsprint specified in Section 42753 to determine the comparable quality of recycled-content newsprint to virgin material. These standards shall be based on the average numerical standards of printing opacity, brightness level, and cross machine tear strength available from all producers selling recycled-content newsprint in the state in quantities of at least 5,000 metric tons per year. The board shall set standards which deviate from this average by not more than 5 percent.

(b) The board shall review its standards at least once every two years and determine whether they should be adjusted to reflect changes in industry standards and practices, and, if so, the board shall set new standards according to the criteria in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 23.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. False Certification [42780. - 42783.]

42780.

If any person provides a consumer of newsprint with a false or misleading certificate concerning the recycled content of the delivered newsprint pursuant to Section 42772, the board, within 30 days of making this determination, shall refer the false or misleading certificate to the Attorney General for prosecution for fraud.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 23.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

42781.

If any consumer of newsprint provides the board with a false or misleading certificate concerning the percentage of recycled-content newsprint used pursuant to Section 42770, the board within 30 days of making this determination, shall refer the false or misleading certificate to the Attorney General for prosecution for fraud.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 23.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

42782.

If any consumer of newsprint provides the board with a false or misleading certificate concerning why the consumer of newsprint was unable to obtain the minimum amounts of recycled-content newsprint pursuant to Section 42773, the board, within 30 days of making this determination, shall refer the false or misleading certificate to the Attorney General for prosecution for fraud.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 23.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

42783.

Specific information on newsprint prices included as part of a certificate submitted to the board by newsprint consumers or suppliers of newsprint is propriety information and shall not be made available to the general public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 23.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Penalties [42790. - 42791.]

42790.

Any person who violates Article 3 (commencing with Section 42770) is guilty of an infraction punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 663, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

42791.

In addition to Section 42790, any person who violates Article 3 (commencing with Section 42770) may be assessed a civil penalty by the board of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation, pursuant to notice and hearing. Any civil penalties received pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited in a separate account in the fund and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be used by the board for the administration of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 663, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16. Waste Tires [42800. - 42855.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [42800. - 42808.]

42800.

The following definitions govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 24.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

42801.

“Agricultural purposes” means the use of waste tires as bumpers on agricultural equipment or as a ballast to maintain covers or structures on an agricultural site.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 24.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

42801.5.

(a) “Altered waste tire” means a waste tire that has been baled, shredded, chopped, or split apart. “Altered waste tire” does not mean crumb rubber.

(b) “Alteration” or “altering,” with reference to a waste tire, means an action that produces an altered waste tire.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 838, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

42801.6.

“Baled tire” means either a whole or an altered tire that has been compressed and then secured with a binding material for the purpose of reducing its volume.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 838, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

42801.7.

“Crumb rubber” means rubber granules derived from a waste tire that are less than or equal to, one-quarter inch or six millimeters in size.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 838, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

42802.

“Fund” means the California Tire Recycling Management Fund created by subdivision (a) of Section 42885.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 24.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

42803.

“Local agency” means a county, city, special district, or other local governmental agency which provides or regulates solid waste handling services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 24.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

42803.5.

“New or used motor vehicle” means any device by which any person or property may be propelled, moved or drawn upon a highway, excepting a device moved exclusively by human power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 838, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

42804.

“Operator” means the person responsible for the overall operation of a waste tire facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 24.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

42805.

“Owner” means a person who owns, in whole or in part, a waste tire facility, the waste tires located at a facility, or the land on which a waste tire facility is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 24.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

42805.5.

“Repairable tire” means a worn, damaged, or defective tire that is retreadable, recappable, or regrooveable, or that can be otherwise repaired to return the tire to its use as a vehicle tire, and that meets the applicable requirements of the Vehicle Code and Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 838, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

42805.6.

“Scrap tire” means a worn, damaged, or defective tire that is not a repairable tire.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 838, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

42805.7.

“Tire derived product” means material that meets both of the following requirements:

(a) Is derived from a process using whole tires as a feedstock. A process using whole tires includes, but is not limited to, shredding, crumbing, or chipping.

(b) Has been sold and removed from the processing facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 838, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

42806.

“Tire” means a pneumatic tire or solid tire manufactured for use on any type of motor vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 24.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

42806.5.

“Used tire” means a tire that meets all of the following requirements:

(a) The tire is no longer mounted on a vehicle but is still suitable for use as a vehicle tire.

(b) The tire meets the applicable requirements of the Vehicle Code and Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) (1) The used tire is ready for resale, is stored by size in a rack or a stack not more than two rows wide, but not in a pile, and is stored in accordance with local fire and vector control requirements and with state minimum standards.

(2) A used tire stored pursuant to this section shall be stored in a manner to allow the inspection of each individual tire.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 625, Sec. 10.   Effective September 17, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

42807.

“Waste tire” means a tire that is no longer mounted on a vehicle and is no longer suitable for use as a vehicle tire due to wear, damage, or deviation from the manufacturer’s original specifications. A waste tire includes a repairable tire, scrap tire, altered waste tire, and a used tire that is not organized for inspection and resale by size in a rack or a stack in accordance with Section 42806.5, but does not include a tire derived product or crumb rubber.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 404, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

42808.

“Waste tire facility” means a location, other than a solid waste facility permitted pursuant to this division that receives for transfer or disposal less than 150 tires per day averaged on an annual basis, where, at any time, waste tires are stored, stockpiled, accumulated, or discarded. “Waste tire facility” includes all of the following:

(a) “Existing waste tire facility” means a waste tire facility which is receiving, storing, or accumulating waste tires, or upon which waste tires are discarded, on January 1, 1990.

(b) “Major waste tire facility” means a waste tire facility where, at any time, 5,000 or more waste tires are or will be stored, stockpiled, accumulated, or discarded.

(c) “Minor waste tire facility” means a waste tire facility where, at any time, 500 or more, but less than 5,000, waste tires are or will be stored, stockpiled, accumulated, or discarded. However, a “minor waste tire facility” does not include a tire dealer or an automobile dismantler, as defined in Sections 220 and 221 of the Vehicle Code, who stores waste tires on the dealer’s or dismantler’s premises for less than 90 days if not more than 1,500 total used or waste tires are ever accumulated on the dealer’s or dismantler’s premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 625, Sec. 11.   Effective September 17, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [42810. - 42812.]

42810.

Nothing in this chapter limits the authority of a local agency to regulate persons or businesses that store, stockpile, process, or dispose of waste tires.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 717, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

42811.

The board may delegate specific powers and authority in this chapter to enforcement agencies, as defined in Section 40130, including any of the following:
